Washington statutes.
RCW 36.94.030

Adoption of sewerage and/or water general plan as element of comprehensive plan.

Whenever the county legislative authority deems it advisable and necessary for the public health and welfare of the inhabitants of the county to establish, purchase, acquire, and construct a system of sewerage and/or water, or make any additions and betterments thereto, or extensions thereof, the board shall adopt a sewerage and/or water general plan for a system of sewerage and/or water for all or a portion of the county as deemed necessary by the board. If the county has adopted a comprehensive plan for a physical development of the county pursuant to chapter 36.70 RCW and/or chapter 35.63 RCW, then the sewerage and/or water general plan shall be adopted as an element of that comprehensive plan pursuant to the applicable statute.

[ 1981 c 313 s 15; 1967 c 72 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 313: See note following RCW 36.94.020.